test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k48_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hamar
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hamar
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hamri
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: hamars
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hamrar
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hamrar
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [homrum, hamrum]
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: hamra
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hamarin
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hamarin
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: hamrinum
    hamar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hamarsins
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hamrarnir
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hamrarnar
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [homrunum, hamrunum]
    hamar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: hamranna
